West Virginia, session 2025, HB3192.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: CHAPTER 18. EDUCATION. ARTICLE 11. WEST VIRGINIA UNIVERSITY. §1 Repeal of article regarding West Virginia University. That §18-11-1, §18-11-1a, §18-11-1b, §18-11-2, §18-11-3, §18-11-4, §18-11-4a, §18-11-4d, §18-11-5, §18-11-5b, §18-11-5d, §18-11-6, §18-11-6a, §18-11-7, §18-11-8, §18-11-8a, §18-11-9, §18-11-9a, §18-11-10, §18-11-10a, §18-11-11, §18-11-19, §18-11-20, §18-11-21, §18-11-22, §18-11-23, §18-11-24, and §18-11-25 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. ARTICLE 11A. REVENUE BONDS FOR UNIVERSITY CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS. §1 Repeal of article regarding Revenue Bonds for University Capital Improvements. That 18-11A-1, §18-11A-2, §18-11A-3, §18-11A-4, §18-11A-5, §18-11A-6, §18-11A-7, and §18-11A-8 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. ARTICLE 11B. REVENUE BONDS FOR UNIVERSITY FACILITIES, BUILDINGS AND STRUCTURES. §1 Repeal of article regarding Revenue Bonds for University Facilities, Buildings and structures. That §18-11B-1, §18-11B-2, §18-11B-3, §18-11B-4, §18-11B-5, §18-11B-6, §18-11B-7, §18-11B-8, §18-11B-9, §18-11B-10, §18-11B-11, and §18-11B-12 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. ARTICLE 11D.  REVENUE BONDS FOR WEST VIRGINIA UNIVERSITY ATHLETIC FACILITIES. §1 Repeal of article regarding Revenue Bonds for West Virginia University Athletic Facilities. That §18-11D-1, §18-11D-2, §18-11D-3, §18-11D-4, §18-11D-5, §18-11D-6, §18-11D-7, §18-11D-8, §18-11D-9, §18-11D-10, §18-11D-11, §18-11D-12, §18-11D-13, §18-11D-14, and §18-11D-15 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. ARTICLE 11E. REVENUE BONDS FOR MARSHALL UNIVERSITY ATHLETIC FACILITIES. §1 Repeal of article regarding Revenue Bonds for Marshall University Athletic Facilities. That §18-11E-1, §18-11E-2, §18-11E-3, §18-11E-4, §18-11E-5, §18-11E-6, §18-11E-7, §18-11E-8, §18-11E-9, §18-11E-10, §18-11E-11, §18-11E-12, §18-11E-13, §18-11E-14, and §18-11E-15 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. ARTICLE 12. STATE TEACHERS’ COLLEGES. §1 Repeal of article regarding State Teachers’ Colleges. That §18-12-1 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. ARTICLE 12A. REVENUE BONDS FOR MARSHALL UNIVERSITY CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS. §1 Repeal of article regarding Revenue Bonds for Marshall University Capital Improvements. That §18-12A-1, §18-12A-2, §18-12A-3, §18-12A-4, §18-12A-5, §18-12A-6, §18-12A-7, and §18-12A-8 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. ARTICLE 12B. REVENUE BONDS FOR STATE INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION – CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS ON SYSTEM BASIS. §1 Repeal of article regarding Revenue Bonds for State Institutions of Higher Education – Capital Improvements on System Basis. That §18-12B-1, §18-12B-2, §18-12B-3, §18-12B-4, §18-12B-5, §18-12B-6, §18-12B-7, §18-12B-8, §18-12B-9, §18-12B-10, §18-12B-11, and §18-12B-12 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. ARTICLE 19. EDUCATIONAL OPPORTUNITIES FOR CHILDREN AND SPOUSES OF DECEASED SOLDIERS, SAILORS, MARINES AND AIRMEN. §1 Repeal of article regarding Educational Opportunities for Children and Spouses of Deceased Soldiers, Sailors, Marines and Airmen. That §18-19-1, §18-19-2, §18-19-3, and §18-19-4 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. ARTICLE 22C. STATE AID FOR STUDENTS ATTENDING GREENBRIER COLLEGE OF OSTEOPATHIC MEDICINE. §1 Repeal of article regarding State Aid for Students Attending Greenbrier College of Osteopathic Medicine. That §18-22C-1 and §18-22C-2 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. ARTICLE 22D. HIGHER EDUCATION STUDENT ASSISTANCE LOAN PROGRAM. §1 Repeal of article regarding Higher Education Student Assistance Loan Program. That §18-22D-1, §18-22D-2, §18-22D-3, §18-22D-4, §18-22D-5, §18-22D-6, §18-22D-7, §18-22D-8, and §18-22D-9 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. ARTICLE 23. ADDTIONAL POWERS, DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF GOVERNING BOARDS OF STATE INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION. §1 Repeal of sections relating to bonds, appropriations, accounts, and record keeping. That §18-23-6, §18-23-7, §18-23-9, §18-23-10, §18-23-16, §18-23-17 and §18-23-19 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. CHAPTER 18B. HIGHER EDUCATION. ARTICLE 1. GOVERNANCE. §1 Repeal of sections relating to certain governance provisions. That §18b-1-1a, §18b-1-3, §18b-1-8 and §18b-1-11 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. ARTICLE 1A. COMPACT WITH HIGHER EDUCATION FOR THE FUTURE OF WEST VIRGINIA. §1 Repealing article creating Compact with Higher Education for the Future of West Virginia. That §18B-1A-4, §18B-1A-5, and §18B-1A-6 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. ARTICLE 1C. WEST VIRGINIA UNIVERSITY INSTITUTE OF TECHNOLOGY. §1 Repeal of section regarding to legislative findings and intent. That §18B-1C-1 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, is repealed. ARTICLE 1D. HIGHER EDUCATION ACCOUNTABILITY. §1 Repeal of section relating to state compacts. That §18B-1D-6 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, is repealed. ARTICLE 1F. MANAGEMENT AGREEMENTS FOR THE HIGHER EDUCATION POLICY COMMISSION. §1 Repeal of section requiring study and report by the Department of Commerce. That §18B-1F-10 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, is repealed. ARTICLE 2. UNIVERSITY OF WEST VIRGINIA BOARD OF TRUSTEES. §1 Repealing article relating to University of West Virginia Board of Trustees. That §18B-2-6 and §18B-2-8 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. ARTICLE 2A. INSTITUTIONAL BOARD OF GOVERNORS. §1 Repeal of sections regarding public school service program, university status and transfer of operations. That §18B-2A-5, §18B-2A-6, §18B-2A-7 and §18B-2A-7a of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. ARTICLE 2B. WEST VIRGINIA COUNCIL FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE EDUCATION. §1 Repeal of section regarding legislative findings, intent and purpose. That §18B-2B-1 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, is repealed. ARTICLE 3. ADDITIONAL POWERS AND DUTIES OF GOVERNING BOARDS. §1 Repeal of section duty of governing boards to address state priorities. That §18B-3-4 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, is repealed. ARTICLE 3B. COLLABORATIVE DEGREE COMPLETION PROGRAM. §1 Repeal of article creating Collaborative Degree Completion Program. That §18B-3B-1, §18B-3B-2, and §18B-3B-3 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. ARTICLE 3C. COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM. §1 Repeal of sections regarding separation from former sponsoring four year institution and collaboration with federal apprenticeship programs. That §18B-3C-5, §18B-3C-7, §18B-3C-7a, §18B-3C-10, §18B-3C-11, §18B-3C-12, §18B-3C-13, §18B-3C-15, and §18B-3C-16 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. ARTICLE 3E. EASTERN WEST VIRGINIA COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE. §1 Repeal of article regarding Eastern West Virginia Community and Technical College. That §18B-3E-1 and §18B-3E-2 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. ARTICLE 3F. REORGANIZATION OF COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES. §1 Repeal of article setting forth Reorganization of Community and Technical Colleges. That §18B-3F-1, §18B-3F-2,  §18B-3F-3, §18B-3F-4, §18B-3F-5, §18B-3F-6, §18B-3F-7, §18B-3F-8, §18B-3F-9, and §18B-3F-10 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. ARTICLE 4. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION. §1 Repeal of sections regarding development of benefit programs and crimes committed on campuses. That §18B-4-2a and §18B-4-5a of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. ARTICLE 7. PERSONNEL GENERALLY. §1 Repeal of section regarding study of employment practices. That §18B-7-16 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, is repealed. ARTICLE 9A. CLASSIFICATION AND COMPENSATION SYSTEM. §1 Repeal of sections establishing compensation planning and review committee and restricting duties thereof. That §18B-9A-5 and §18B-9A-5a of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. ARTICLE 11. MISCELLANEOUS INSTITUTES AND CENTERS. §1 Repeal of sections creating center for regional progress and institute for international trade development. That §18B-11-1 and §18B-11-3 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. ARTICLE 14. MISCELLANEOUS. §1 Repeal of sections requiring certain studies and reports thereon. That §18B-14-1, §18B-14-2, and §18B-14-9 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. ARTICLE 17. LEGISLATIVE RULES. §1 Repeal of sections authorizing specific rules. That §18B-17-4, §18B-17-5, and §18B-17-6 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed. ARTICLE 19. CAPITAL PROJECTS AND FACILITIES NEEDS. §1 Repeal of sections regarding legislative findings and intent and development of a higher education facilities information system. That §18B-19-1, and §18B-19-9 of the Code of West Virginia, 1931, as amended, are repealed.